Hawaii statutes.
§24-5 Allowance for expenses while
traveling on official legislative business without the State. A member of
the legislature while traveling without the State on official legislative
business and when authorized by the presiding officer of the respective house,
shall receive an allowance to cover all personal expenses, such as board,
lodging, and incidental expenses but not travel expenses. The allowance under
this section shall be set at a single rate that will:

(1) Not exceed the greater of the maximum allowance
for such expenses payable to any public officer or employee of the federal
government or the State;

(2) Be reasonably calculated to cover the expenses
specified in this section; and

(3) Be determined jointly by the president of the
senate and the speaker of the house of representatives for the legislature as a
whole.

The allowance shall be in addition to the allowance
that the member may be entitled to receive under section 24-2. [L 1969, c 5, pt
of §1; am L 1981, c 164, §1(3); gen ch 1985; am L 2005, c 222, §4]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next